North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Part 2. Other Programs Controlled by the Department.

§ 131E-65.
Alcohol Detoxification Program.

There shall be no reduction of services offered, no contracting of primary services, nor removal of this facility from Buncombe County without prior approval of the General Assembly.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-66.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 589, s. 40.

§ 131E-67.
Specialty hospitals.

All functions, powers, duties, and obligations heretofore vested in the Board of Directors of the North Carolina Specialty Hospitals and Eastern North Carolina Hospital are hereby transferred to and vested in the Department. All appropriations heretofore made to such Board of Directors or to any of the hospitals are hereby transferred to the Department. The Secretary of the Department shall have the power and duty to adopt rules for the operation of these facilities.

History.

1979, c. 838, s. 46; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§§ 131E-68,
131E-69.

Reserved for future codification purposes.